Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.250

State board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers—Composition—Terms—Vacancies—Oath.

The state board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers is created to consist of five members who are participants under this chapter, at least three of whom are not receiving relief or retirement pension payments under this chapter, no two of whom shall be from the same congressional district. The members are appointed by the governor to serve overlapping terms of six years. Of members first appointed, one shall be appointed for a term of six years, one for five years, one for four years, one for three years, and one for two years. The governor may consider participants who are recommended for appointment by the appropriate state associations. Upon the expiration of a term, a successor shall be appointed by the governor for a term of six years. Any vacancy shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term. Each member of the state board, before entering on the performance of his or her duties, shall take an oath that he or she will not knowingly violate or willingly permit the violation of any provision of law applicable to this chapter, which oath shall be filed with the secretary of state.

The state board is not unlawfully constituted and a member of the board is not ineligible to serve the remainder of the member's unexpired term on the board solely by reason of the establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional districts.

[ 2007 c 56 s 1; 1999 c 148 s 23; 1989 c 91 s 22; 1982 1st ex.s. c 30 s 11; 1955 c 263 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.